Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Article 6. Accounts.

§ 6.2-1166.
Accounts of state savings institutions.

Notwithstanding any restriction in its articles of incorporation limiting the number, kinds and classes of accounts that it may offer, a state savings institution may offer such accounts, including checking accounts, time deposit accounts, and savings accounts, as its board of directors may authorize from time to time. A state savings institution may pay interest on such accounts at such rates and under such terms and conditions as its board of directors may direct from time to time, subject to any restrictions and limitations imposed by state or federal law on the payment of interest.

History.

1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.49; 1991, c. 230, § 6.1-194.133; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1167.
Rules governing withdrawal.

The holder of a savings account in a savings institution shall have the right to withdraw all or any part of his account. A savings institution shall have the right to establish the rules governing the withdrawals and may from time to time fix the period of notice required to be given for withdrawal. In no event shall a savings institution delay or postpone the whole or partial payment of the value of any savings account pursuant to a written withdrawal application by a savings account holder for a period exceeding 30 days following the receipt of such application without first securing written permission from the Commissioner.

The holder of a federal tax and loan account or note account as defined in regulations of the U.S. Treasury Department or other federal agency shall have the right of immediate withdrawal of all or any part of such account. In no event shall a savings institution delay or postpone the whole or partial payment of such an account pursuant to a written application by the account holder.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-201.21; 1960, c. 402; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-148; 1972, c. 796, § 6.1-195.21; 1979, c. 76; 1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.50; 1990, c. 3; 1991, c. 230, § 6.1-194.134; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1168.
Redemption.

At any time that funds are on hand for the purpose, a mutual savings institution shall have the right to redeem by lot or otherwise, as the board of directors may determine, all or any part of any of its savings accounts on an earnings date by giving 30 days’ notice by certified mail addressed to each affected account holder at his last address as recorded on the books of the institution. No mutual savings institution shall redeem any of its savings accounts when its liabilities exceed its assets or when it has applications for withdrawal that have been on file more than 30 days and have not been reached for payment. The redemption price of savings accounts redeemed shall be the full value of the account redeemed, as determined by the board of directors, but in no event shall the redemption price be less than the withdrawal value. If the notice of redemption has been duly given, and if on or before the redemption date the funds necessary for such redemption have been set aside to be, and continue to be, available therefor, interest upon the accounts called for redemption shall cease to accrue from and after the date specified as the redemption date. All rights with respect to such accounts shall terminate upon the redemption date, other than any right of the account holder of record to receive the redemption price without interest. Accounts called for redemption, if unclaimed, shall be subject to the Virginia Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act (§

55.1-2500

et seq.).

History.

1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.51; 2010, c. 794.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted
“Virginia Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act (§

55.1-2500

et seq.)” for “Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act (§ 55-210.1 et seq.).”

§ 6.2-1169.
Accounts of savings institutions as legal investments and as security.

Administrators, executors, custodians, conservators, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries, insurance companies, business and manufacturing companies, banks, trust companies, credit unions and other types of similar financial organizations, charitable, educational, and eleemosynary funds and organizations, and all agencies, localities, and other political subdivisions and governmental units of the Commonwealth are specifically authorized to invest funds held by them, without any order of any court, in accounts of savings institutions authorized to do business in the Commonwealth. Such investments shall be deemed and held to be legal investments for such funds. The provisions of this section are supplemental to any and all other laws relating to and declaring what shall be legal investments for the persons referred to in this section.

History.

1972, c. 796, § 6.1-195.50; 1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.52; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1170.
Deposits of federal taxes and U.S. Treasury tax and loan accounts.

Savings institutions may:

Serve as depositories for federal taxes and for U.S. Treasury tax and loan deposits;

Satisfy any requirements in connection therewith, including maintaining tax and loan accounts and note accounts, as defined by regulations of the U.S. Treasury Department or other federal agency;

Pledge collateral; and

Satisfy the requirements of the U.S. Treasury Department in connection with such deposits.

History.

1979, c. 77, § 6.1-195.22:2; 1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.53; 1990, c. 3; 1991, c. 230, § 6.1-194.135; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1171.
Accounts under federal Self-Employed Individuals Tax Retirement Act and federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (P.L. 93-406, 88 Stat. 829).

To the extent allowed by federal law, an insured savings institution may act as trustee or custodian under the federal Self-Employed Individuals Tax Retirement Act of 1962, as amended. Funds held as such trustee or custodian may be invested in accounts of the association to the extent that the trust, custodial or other plan does not prohibit such investment.

To the extent allowed by federal law, an insured savings institution may act as trustee or custodian of individual retirement accounts under the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (P.L. 93-406, 88 Stat. 829), as amended. Contributions may be accepted and interest thereon retained by such institution pursuant to forms provided by it and may be invested in accounts of the institution in accordance with the terms upon which such contributions were accepted.

History.

1972, c. 796, § 6.1-195.49; 1975, c. 79, § 6.1-195.49:1; 1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.54; 1986, c. 509; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1172.
Accounts issued in name of minor.

A savings institution may issue accounts to a minor as sole and absolute owner of the account. With respect to any such account, a savings institution may (i) receive deposits by or for the minor owner, (ii) pay withdrawals, (iii) accept pledges to the association, and (iv) act in any other manner with respect to such accounts on the order of the minor owner. Any payment or delivery of funds from such account to its owner, or payment of a check or other written order for withdrawal signed by its minor owner, shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge of the institution for any payment or delivery so made. The parent or guardian of the minor owner shall not in his capacity as parent or guardian have the power to withdraw or transfer funds in any such account unless the minor has given written notice to the association to accept the signature of such parent or guardian.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-201.23; 1960, c. 402; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-150; 1972, c. 796, § 6.1-195.25; 1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.55; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1173.
Powers of attorney on accounts.

Any savings institution may continue to recognize the authority of an attorney-in-fact authorized in writing to manage or to make withdrawals, either in whole or in part, from any account until it receives written notice or is on actual notice of the revocation of his authority. For the purposes of this section, written notice of death of the owner of the account shall constitute written notice of revocation of the authority of his attorney. Written notice of the adjudication of incapacity of an account owner shall constitute written notice of revocation of the authority of his attorney unless under the laws of the Commonwealth the authority of the attorney-in-fact survives such adjudication. Payment of the account in accordance with the provisions of this section shall constitute a full discharge and acquittance of the association as to such account.

History.

1972, c. 796, § 6.1-195.27; 1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.56; 1997, c. 801; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1174.
Accounts of deceased or incompetent persons.

A savings institution may pay funds held in the account of a deceased person or a person under disability to the personal representative, committee, conservator, guardian, or curator of such person upon proper proof of the appointment and qualification of such fiduciary. Any savings institution making such payment shall not thereafter be liable for the amount thereof to any person. The presentation of a duly certified letter or certificate of qualification as personal representative or other fiduciary shall be conclusive proof of the jurisdiction of the court issuing the same.

A savings institution that has not received written notice and is not on actual notice that an account owner is deceased or has been adjudicated incompetent may pay or deliver funds held in such person’s account in accordance with the provisions of the account contract without liability to any person for the amounts so paid or delivered.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-201.25; 1960, c. 402; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-152; 1972, c. 796, § 6.1-195.28; 1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.57; 2010, c. 794.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-441 Certificate/Letter of Qualification; No. 15-451 Affidavit Under Virginia Small Estate Act.

§ 6.2-1175.
Repealed by Acts 2010, c. 269, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 269 repealed former § 6.1-194.58, from which this section as enacted by Acts 2010, c. 794, was derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2010, c. 794, cl. 4, the 2010 repeal by c. 269 has been given effect in this section.

Former § 6.1-194.58, relating to payment of small balance to distributees or other persons, was derived from Code 1950, § 6-201.26; 1960, c. 402; 1962, c. 524; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-153; 1972, c. 796, § 6.1-195.29; 1973, c. 128; 1977, c. 138; 1984, c. 302; 1985, c. 425; 1986, c. 334; 1987, c. 276; 1997, c. 278; 2002, cc. 187, 220, 227.

§ 6.2-1176.
Accounts of fiduciaries.

A savings institution may issue accounts in the name of any administrator, executor, custodian, conservator, guardian, trustee, or other fiduciary for a named beneficiary or beneficiaries. The payment of funds from any such account pursuant to a check or other written order of withdrawal signed by the fiduciary, the delivery of funds in such account to such fiduciary, or a receipt signed by any such fiduciary with regard to the payment of funds from such account, shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge of the institution for the payment or delivery so made.

History.

1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.59; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1177.
Savings institution need not inquire as to fiduciary funds deposited in fiduciary’s personal account.

If any fiduciary or agent makes a deposit in a savings institution to his personal credit of checks drawn by him upon an account in his own name as fiduciary, or of checks drawn by him upon an account in the name of his principal, if he is empowered to draw checks thereto, or of checks payable to his principal and endorsed by him as fiduciary, the institution receiving the deposit:

Shall not be required to inquire whether the fiduciary is committing thereby a breach of his obligation as fiduciary; and

Is authorized to pay the amount of the deposit or any part thereof upon the withdrawal by the fiduciary without being liable to the principal, unless the institution receives the deposit or pays the withdrawal with (i) actual knowledge that the fiduciary, in making such deposit or in making such withdrawal, is committing a breach of his obligation as fiduciary or (ii) knowledge of such facts that its action in receiving the deposit or paying the withdrawal amounts to bad faith.

History.

1980, c. 329, § 6.1-195.27:1; 1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.60; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1178.
Accounts held by various trustees for same beneficiary.

Whenever trust interests or accounts are created for the same beneficiary, and each interest or account is in the name of a separate and distinct trustee or combination of trustees, each trust interest or account shall constitute a separate, distinct, and valid trust entity for all purposes.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-201.22:1; 1966, cc. 219, 584, § 6.1-149.1; 1972, c. 796, § 6.1-195.24; 1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.61; 2010, c. 794.